Massachusetts, session 194th, H1255.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b) of section 25 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “2 business
days” and inserting in place thereof the following:- 24 hours.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (b) of said section 25 of said chapter 176O, is hereby
further amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- Payers and entities acting for
payers under contract shall not use appeals processes or other administrative means to delay
responding a to completed prior authorization request from a provider in accordance with this
subsection. The division shall conduct audits to ensure compliance with this subsection.
of 1